Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB54.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 5 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
As used in Sections 1 to 12 of this Act:
(1) "Commission" means the Advisory Redistricting Commission;
(2) "Commissioner" means a person who is selected or appointed as a member of the
Advisory Redistricting Commission;
(3) "Local government" means any of the following:
(a) City government;
(b) County government;
(c) Urban-county government;
(d) Charter county government;
(e) Consolidated local government; or
(f) Unified local government;
(4) "Major political party" means either of the two (2) political parties with the
largest representation in the General Assembly;
(5) "Population" means the most recent United States Census data collected under
Pub. L. No. 94-171; and
(6) "Redistricting" means the drawing of boundary lines for election districts in
order to achieve, as nearly as possible, equal population among the election
districts.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 5 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Advisory Redistricting Commission is hereby created as a permanent
commission for the purpose of drawing and adopting redistricting plans after
each decennial census, or as required by law, for each of the following districts:
Page 1 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
(a) State senatorial districts;
(b) State representative districts; and
(c) Congressional districts.
(2) The commission shall consist of fifteen (15) commissioners appointed in
accordance with Section 3 of this Act. Each commissioner shall:
(a) Be registered and eligible to vote in the Commonwealth of Kentucky;
(b) Not currently, nor in the past six (6) years, have been any of the following:
1. A declared candidate for any partisan elective office;
2. A partisan elected official or person appointed to fill a vacancy in any
partisan elective office;
3. An officer or member of the governing body of any national, state, or
local political party;
4. A paid partisan consultant or an employee of any partisan elected
official or partisan political candidate, part of a partisan political
candidate's campaign, or a political action committee;
5. An employee of the General Assembly, including employees of the
Legislative Research Commission; or
6. A legislative agent as defined in KRS 6.611, legislative agent employer
as defined in KRS 6.611, executive agency lobbyist, or any other
person employed as a lobbyist as defined in KRS 11A.010;
(c) Not the parent, stepparent, child, stepchild, sibling, or spouse of any
individual who is disqualified from serving as a commissioner under
paragraph (b) of this subsection;
(d) Not otherwise be ineligible for appointed or elective office;
(e) Have voted in at least two (2) of the last three (3) statewide elections;
(f) Not have donated more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), in sum and for
the same election, to an elected candidate, a candidate's political action
Page 2 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
committee or permanent committee, a caucus campaign committee, or an
executive committee;
(g) Not have switched political party affiliation within the five (5) years
preceding the appointment;
(h) Not have lived in the same household or shared the same residential address
with any individual who is disqualified from serving as a commissioner
under paragraph (b) of this subsection; and
(i) Attest under oath that he or she meets the qualifications set forth in this
section.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 5 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In accordance with the requirements of this section and Section 2 of this Act, not
later than July 15 of the year of the federal decennial census, and decennially
thereafter:
(a) 1. Eight (8) commissioners shall be appointed as follows:
a. Two (2) members appointed by the President of the Senate;
b. Two (2) members appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives;
c. Two (2) members appointed by the Minority Leader of the
Senate; and
d Two (2) members appointed by the Minority Leader of the House
of Representatives.
2. Commissioners appointed by the members of the General Assembly
pursuant to subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall include
representation of at least one (1) commissioner from each
congressional district of this state. If the appointing authority cannot
mutually agree to this requirement, the President of the Senate shall
Page 3 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
appoint commissioners who reside in the First and Second
Congressional Districts, the Speaker of the House of Representatives
shall appoint commissioners who reside in the Third and Fourth
Congressional Districts, the Minority Leader of the Senate shall
appoint one (1) of his or her two (2) appointees to be a commissioner
who resides in the Fifth Congressional District, and the Minority
Leader of the House of Representatives shall appoint one (1) of his or
her two (2) appointees to be a commissioner who resides in the Sixth
Congressional District; and
(b) The Secretary of State shall:
1. Issue a call to convene the commission;
2. Prescribe and furnish applications for the position of redistricting
commissioner to be made available to residents of this state by
publishing notice of the commission, with application forms, on the
internet and in two (2) or more newspapers of general circulation in
the state. The Secretary of State shall also issue press releases to
various media outlets, including radio and television stations servicing
residents of this state. The applications, publications, and press
releases shall provide Kentucky residents with information on the
commission's objectives and obligations, the requirements of Section 2
of this Act, the process by which residents can apply, and a point of
contact for direct questions;
3. Mail additional applications as prescribed under subparagraph 2. of
this paragraph to five thousand (5,000) registered voters of this state,
selected at random and witnessed by a classified employee of the
Secretary of State's office, of which one thousand (1,000) registered
voters shall be registered with one (1) major political party, one
Page 4 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
thousand (1,000) registered voters shall be registered with a different
and contrasting major political party, and three thousand (3,000)
registered voters shall not be registered with either major political
party;
4. Require applicants to attest, under the validity of signature and
penalty of perjury, whether they are registered with one (1) of the two
(2) major political parties or whether they are not registered with
either major political party; and
5. Require applicants to attest, under the validity of signature and
penalty of perjury, that they meet the qualifications set forth in
subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act.
(2) No sooner than August 10 but not later than August 15, of the year of the federal
decennial census, and decennially thereafter, from all applications submitted
under subsection (1)(b) of this section, the Secretary of State shall:
(a) Eliminate incomplete applications and applications of persons who do not
meet the requirements established in subsection (1)(b) of this section and
subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act, based solely on the information
contained within the applications;
(b) Randomly select forty (40) qualifying applicants, of which ten (10)
applicants shall be selected from one (1) pool of applicants registered with
one (1) of the two (2) major political parties, ten (10) applicants shall be
selected from the pool of applicants who are registered from the different
and contrasting major political party, and twenty (20) applicants shall be
selected from the pool of applicants who are not registered with either of the
two (2) major political parties. The random selection shall be witnessed by a
classified employee of the Secretary of State's office;
(c) Inform the forty (40) qualifying applicants that they have been randomly
Page 5 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
selected and that their applications will be delivered to the eight (8)
commissioners appointed by the General Assembly for potential
appointment as a commissioner; and
(d) Deliver the applications of the qualifying forty (40) applicants to the
commissioners appointed by the General Assembly under subsection (1)(a)
of this section.
(3) (a) Not later than September 1 of the year of the federal decennial census, and
decennially thereafter, the commissioners appointed by the General
Assembly shall appoint an additional seven (7) commissioners from the
forty (40) applicants referred by the Secretary of State.
(b) Two (2) commissioners shall be appointed from one (1) pool of applicants
registered with one (1) of the two (2) major political parties, two (2)
commissioners shall be appointed from the pool of applicants from the
different and contrasting major political party, and three (3) applicants
shall be appointed from the pool of applicants who are not registered with
either of the two (2) major political parties.
(c) Each of the seven (7) commissioners appointed under this subsection shall
be appointed with the affirmative roll-call vote of no less than five (5) of the
commissioners appointed by the General Assembly.
(d) As part of the appointment process of the additional seven (7)
commissioners, the commissioners appointed by the General Assembly may
request essays and letters of recommendation from, and interview any or all
of, the forty (40) applicants for a determination of appointment.
(4) Not later than September 1 of the year of the federal decennial census, and
decennially thereafter, the process for the random selection of additional
commissioners by the Secretary of State and the appointment of seven (7)
additional commissioners by commissioners appointed by the General Assembly,
Page 6 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
shall be completed in accordance with the requirements of this section and
subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act.
(5) The commission membership shall be inclusive of any person or group of people
representing a political party, those without affiliation to a political party, rural
or urban, and include persons of racial and linguistic minorities.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 5 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The terms of the commissioners shall expire once the commission has completed
its obligations for a census cycle or as otherwise required by law. Commissioners
may be reappointed or selected for the subsequent decennial census to serve as
commissioners. If vacancies occur, appointments to fill a vacancy shall occur not
more than fourteen (14) calendar days after the vacancy of a commissioner's
seat.
(2) If a commissioner who was appointed by a member of the General Assembly
under subsection (1)(a) of Section 3 of this Act vacates his or her seat on the
commission, the appointing authority of the commissioner shall fill the vacancy
in accordance with the requirements of subsection (2) of Section 2 of this Act and
subsections (1) and (5) of Section 3 of this Act.
(3) (a) If a vacancy occurs in a seat held by a commissioner who was selected at
random and appointed by the commissioners appointed by the General
Assembly under subsections (2) and (3) of Section 3 of this Act, then the
vacancy shall be filled by the Secretary of State in accordance with
subsection (5) of Section 3 of this Act.
(b) A commissioner appointed under this subsection shall be selected from any
of the original forty (40) applicants who were randomly selected but not
appointed.
(c) The person to be appointed to the vacant position shall be derived from the
Page 7 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
same pool of applicants who are registered with a major political party, or
lack thereof, as that of the original commissioner.
(d) The Secretary of State may request essays and letters of recommendation
from, and interview any or all of, the remaining applicants who were not
appointed from the original forty (40) for a determination of appointment.
(4) A commissioner's seat shall become vacant upon the occurrence of any of the
following:
(a) Death or mental incapacity of the commissioner;
(b) The Secretary of State's receipt of the commissioner's written resignation,
which shall be forwarded to the commission;
(c) The commissioner's violation of subsection (3) of Section 6 of this Act or
Section 11 of this Act;
(d) The commissioner ceases to be qualified to serve as a commissioner under
Sections 1 to 12 of this Act; or
(e) The commissioner is removed from service after written notice and an
opportunity for the commissioner to respond, by an affirmative roll-call vote
of nine (9) of the commissioners finding substantial neglect of duty, gross
misconduct in office, or inability to discharge the duties of the office.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 5 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The commission shall be attached to the Legislative Research Commission. If
funds are not available for the purpose of Sections 1 to 12 of this Act, the costs
shall be deemed a necessary government expense and shall be paid from the
general fund surplus account under KRS 48.700 or the budget reserve trust fund
under KRS 48.705.
(2) The commission may carry out the following functions, operations, and activities
in fulfillment of Sections 1 to 12 of this Act, which activities shall include but not
Page 8 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
be limited to:
(a) Retaining or contracting independent and nonpartisan subject matter
experts and legal counsel;
(b) Conducting hearings and meetings;
(c) Publishing notices and maintaining a record of the commission's
proceedings;
(d) Purchasing equipment and computer software;
(e) Hiring administrative staff; and
(f) Any other activity necessary for the commission to conduct its business.
(3) The commission shall furnish reports of expenditures on a quarterly basis to the
secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and to the Legislative
Research Commission and shall be subject to annual audit as provided by law.
(4) For each day that there is a commission meeting or hearing, and each day during
which the commissioner is working in fulfillment of his or her obligations, each
commissioner shall receive as compensation not more than two hundred dollars
($200) per eight (8) hour work day. If a commissioner works less than eight (8)
hours in a day, the two hundred dollars ($200) compensation shall be prorated to
correspond with the number of hours worked by the commissioner. In addition to
compensation as a member of the commission, each commissioner shall be
reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses directly related to meetings and
hearings of the commission.
(5) The commission shall inform the Legislative Research Commission if the
commission determines that funds or other resources provided for operation of
the commission are not adequate.
(6) The Legislative Research Commission shall furnish, under the direction of the
commission, all technical services that the commission deems necessary.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 5 IS CREATED TO
Page 9 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Each commissioner shall perform his or her duties in a manner that is impartial
and reinforces public confidence in the integrity of the redistricting process.
(2) The commissioners, staff, attorneys, and consultants shall not discuss
redistricting matters with members of the public outside of an open meeting or
hearing of the commission, except that a commissioner may communicate about
redistricting matters with members of the public to gain information relevant to
the performance of his or her duties, if communication occurs in writing, or at a
previously publicly noticed forum, hearing, or any other meeting held open to the
general public.
(3) Commissioners, staff, attorneys, experts, and consultants shall not directly or
indirectly solicit or accept any gift or loan of money, goods, services, or other
thing of value greater than twenty dollars ($20) for the benefit of any person or
organization, which may influence the manner in which the commissioner, staff,
attorney, expert, or consultant performs his or her duties.
(4) On or before September 1 during the year of the federal decennial census, a
quorum of the commission shall consist of eight (8) commissioners. After
September 1 of the year of the federal decennial census, and decennially
thereafter, nine (9) commissioners shall constitute a quorum. All meetings and
hearings shall require a quorum. A meeting or hearing of the commission shall
not be held without twenty-four (24) hours notice to all members of the
commission. All votes cast by the commission shall be recorded through a roll-
call vote.
(5) The commission shall conduct its meetings and hearings in a manner that invites
wide public participation throughout the state. The commission shall use
technology to provide public observation and meaningful public participation in
the redistricting process during all meetings and hearings.
Page 10 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
(6) The commission shall adopt the most recent edition of Mason's Manual of
Legislative Procedure as the source of rules of decisions and procedures in all
cases not otherwise provided for in the operations of its respective duties and
obligations in accordance with Sections 1 to 12 of this Act.
(7) All records of the commission shall be considered open records under KRS
61.870 to 61.884. All records and other information generated by the commission
pursuant to Section 5 of this Act shall be made available to the public on the
website established in KRS 7.505. The commission shall conduct all of its
business in open meetings and open hearings under KRS 61.805 to 61.850.
(8) A decision on the dismissal or retention of paid staff or consultants requires the
affirmative roll-call vote of at least nine (9) commissioners.
(9) The commission shall have the authority to be included as the recipient of the
census data as supplied by the United States Census Bureau.
(10) The commission shall elect its own chair, who is a then-current voting
commissioner, by an affirmative roll-call vote of at least nine (9) commissioners.
The chair shall have the authority to select his or her vice chair, who shall also be
a then-current voting member of the commission.
(11) The commission shall select a secretary, who shall be a nonvoting member while
serving as secretary, by an affirmative roll-call vote of at least nine (9)
commissioners, who shall keep a public record of all proceedings of the
commission.
(12) The commission shall have the authority to consult and work with staff of the
Legislative Research Commission, which shall include the sharing of any data or
software.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 5 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Not later than September 15 in the year immediately following the federal
Page 11 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
decennial census, and decennially thereafter, the commission shall adopt
redistricting plans as required by Sections 1 to 12 of this Act for each of the
following types of districts:
(a) State senatorial districts;
(b) State representative districts; and
(c) Congressional districts.
(2) (a) Before the commissioners draft any proposed plans, the commission may
provide testimony and hold hearings before the Interim Joint Committee on
State Government.
(b) Once the commission receives the census data on the population as defined
in Section 1 of this Act, the commission shall hold at least twelve (12) public
hearings throughout the state for the purpose of informing the public about
the redistricting process and the purpose and responsibilities of the
commission, and to solicit information from the public about potential
plans.
(c) The commission shall hold:
1. One (1) of the public hearings in each of the following jurisdictions:
Hodgenville, Paducah, Owensboro, Bowling Green, Lexington,
Covington, Ashland, Pikeville, Somerset, and Hazard; and
2. Two (2) of the public hearings in Louisville.
(d) The commission shall receive for consideration written submissions of
proposed redistricting plans from any resident of the Commonwealth. The
submission of plans shall include all of the supporting documents described
in subsection (1) of Section 8 of this Act. These written submissions shall be
public records and shall be readily available to the public.
(3) (a) Each commissioner shall be limited to proposing one (1) redistricting plan
for each type of district, which may include those plans submitted by
Page 12 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
residents of the Commonwealth under subsection (2) of this section.
(b) Each proposed plan shall be submitted to the secretary of the commission
no later than July 1 in the year immediately following the federal decennial
census, and decennially thereafter.
(c) After all proposed redistricting plans for each type of district are submitted,
the commission shall publish, for notice and comment, the proposed
redistricting plans with the required supporting materials pursuant to
subsection (1) of Section 8 of this Act. The commission shall respond to all
comments in an official capacity of record that is readily available to the
public before voting to adopt any proposed plan. In addition, the proposed
redistricting plans with the required supporting materials shall be published
on the internet, and the commission shall issue press releases to two (2) or
more newspapers of general circulation in the state, and radio and
television stations servicing residents of this state, announcing the
availability of the redistricting plans and required materials for public
review.
(d) Before voting to adopt any proposed plan, the commission shall hold at least
twelve (12) public hearings throughout this state for the purpose of
soliciting comments from the public about the proposed plans. Each of the
proposed plans shall include the required supporting materials pursuant to
subsection (1) of Section 8 of this Act.
(e) The commission shall hold:
1. One (1) of the public hearings in each of the following jurisdictions:
Hodgenville, Paducah, Owensboro, Bowling Green, Lexington,
Covington, Ashland, Pikeville, Somerset, Hazard; and
2. Two (2) of the public hearings in Louisville.
SECTION 8. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 5 IS CREATED TO
Page 13 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Each proposed redistricting plan shall include but not be limited to the following:
(a) Census data to verify the population of each district, which shall include
percentage deviation from the average district population for every district
with a justification of any deviation;
(b) Reference materials;
(c) Maps and legal descriptions that include the political subdivisions of local
governments;
(d) Man-made features, and features such as waterways, which form the
boundaries of the districts;
(e) Programming information used to produce and test the plan; and
(f) Any other supporting materials or underlying data that was used in the
formation of each plan as required by subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The commission shall abide by the following criteria in proposing and adopting
each plan:
(a) Districts shall be of equal population, with minimum percentages of
deviation, as mandated by the United States Constitution and Section 33 of
the Constitution of Kentucky, and shall comply with the Voting Rights Act
of 1965, as amended, applicable federal laws, and applicable state laws;
(b) Districts shall accommodate for relative rates for future growth such that
districts in growth areas have a population in the lower range of the ideal
population;
(c) Districts shall be geographically contiguous;
(d) Districts shall reflect the state's diverse population and communities of
interest. Communities of interest may include but not be limited to
populations that share cultural and historical characteristics, and social
and economic interests. Communities of interest shall not include
Page 14 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
relationships with political parties, incumbents, or political candidates;
(e) Districts shall not provide a disproportionate advantage to any political
party;
(f) 1. Districts shall not favor or disfavor an incumbent elected official or
any candidate.
2. A district shall not be drawn in a way that would move an incumbent
out of his or her district.
3. If there is a conflict between subparagraphs 1. and 2. of this
paragraph, subparagraph 2. shall prevail;
(g) Districts shall reflect consideration of local governments' boundaries;
(h) Districts shall consider arterial highways and other corridors when defining
district boundaries;
(i) Districts shall be reasonably compact;
(j) Consideration of political party affiliation and voting history of citizens of
the Commonwealth may be used as an available source, but shall not be an
established criteria from which districts are drawn; and
(k) Previous election results may be used as an available source, but shall not
be an established criteria from which districts are drawn.
(3) The commission shall adhere to the following procedure in adopting each plan:
(a) Not later than September 15 of the year immediately after the federal
decennial census, and decennially thereafter, the commission shall adopt a
redistricting plan for each type of district. Before voting to adopt any
proposed plan, the commission shall ensure that each proposed plan is
tested, using appropriate technology, for compliance with the criteria
described in subsection (2) of this section. Each proposed plan that will be
voted on shall include the required supporting materials under subsection
(1) of this section;
Page 15 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
(b) Before voting to adopt any proposed plan, the commission shall allow not
less than seven (7) calendar days' public notice of each proposed plan that
will be voted on, and the date, time, and location the vote will occur;
(c) A final decision of the commission to adopt a redistricting plan shall require
the affirmative roll-call vote of nine (9) of the commissioners. If no plan
satisfies this requirement for a type of district, the commission shall use the
following procedure to adopt a plan for that type of district:
1. Each commissioner may submit one (1) proposed redistricting plan for
each type of district to the full commission for consideration, which
may include those plans submitted by residents of this state under
subsection (2) of Section 7 of this Act; and
2. Each commissioner shall rank each plan submitted according to
preference. Each plan shall be assigned a point value inverse to its
ranking among the number of choices, giving the lowest-ranked plan
one (1) point and the highest-ranked plan a point value equal to the
number of plans submitted. The commission shall then adopt the
redistricting plans receiving the highest total points. If plans are tied
for the highest point total, the plan receiving the lowest total points
shall not be considered and the process of adoption shall repeat, in
accordance with this subsection, until a plan is adopted.
(4) Not later than October 1 in the year immediately after the federal census, and
decennially thereafter, the commission shall:
(a) Publish the adopted plans on the internet, which shall include the required
supporting materials pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. In addition,
the commission shall issue a press release to two (2) or more newspapers of
general circulation in the state, and radio and television stations servicing
residents of this state, announcing availability of the plans, explaining
Page 16 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
where they can be located on the internet, and describing how the
legislature will consider the plans; and
(b) Issue a report that is delivered to the Legislative Research Commission,
which shall explain the basis on which the commission made its decisions in
achieving compliance with plan requirements and shall include but not be
limited to the required supporting materials pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section. A commissioner who votes against a redistricting plan may
submit a dissenting report which shall be issued with the commission's
report.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 5 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Legislative Research Commission shall refer the adopted redistricting plans
to the Interim Joint Committee on State Government for its review and
consideration at its October or November meeting, and the Interim Joint
Committee on State Government may hold additional meetings as deemed
necessary. The Interim Joint Committee on State Government may recommend
enactment or rejection of the commission's adopted redistricting plans to the
General Assembly during the next regular session or extraordinary session called
by the Governor for the purposes of redistricting.
(2) Following the review of the Interim Joint Committee on State Government, and
during the next regular session of the General Assembly or an extraordinary
session called by the Governor for the purposes of redistricting, the General
Assembly shall consider the commission's redistricting plans for enactment into
law. The General Assembly may enact or reject the commission's redistricting
plans, but may not alter or amend the plans except for technical amendments,
which do not alter or amend the substance of the plans.
(3) The Committee on Committees of both the House of Representatives and the
Page 17 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
Senate shall refer the redistricting plans to the House Standing Committee on
State Government and the Senate Standing Committee on State and Local
Government, respectively.
(4) If the General Assembly does not enact the commission's adopted redistricting
plans, with each plan being separately considered, by the first Tuesday after the
fourth Monday of the year following the commission's submission of the plans to
the Legislative Research Commission, the General Assembly or either chamber
rejecting the plans, shall return the rejected plans to the commission and request
development of new plans for the redistricting of the districts. Each chamber of
the General Assembly that rejects the plans shall communicate to the commission
its reasons for not enacting the adopted redistricting plans, and may provide
recommendations.
(5) After the return of the redistricting plans, the commission shall then draft a
second set of plans for the redistricting of districts within fourteen (14) business
days of the General Assembly's return of the first set of plans, which shall include
the reasons why, if applicable, for not including the recommendations of the
General Assembly.
(6) If the General Assembly does not enact the commission's second set of
redistricting plans within fourteen (14) business days of the commission's
submission of the second set of redistricting plans, the General Assembly or
either chamber rejecting shall, within seven (7) business days, return the second
set of plans to the commission and communicate to the commission its reasons
for not enacting the second set of redistricting plans. The General Assembly is
then permitted to enact its own legislation regarding the redistricting of districts.
(7) The General Assembly shall separately consider enactment or rejection of the
commission's redistricting plans for the House and Senate state legislative
districts, and the United States Congressional districts.
Page 18 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 5 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an employer shall not discharge,
threaten to discharge, intimidate, coerce, or retaliate against any employee
because of the employee's membership on the commission as a commissioner,
attendance or scheduled attendance, or any other personal obligation that
requires the employee to be absent from any services or employment in which he
or she is then engaged, for a reasonable time, while in service of the commission.
(2) The commission, and all of its responsibilities, operations, functions, contractors,
consultants, and employees, shall not be subject to change, transfer,
reorganization, or reassignment and shall not be altered or abrogated in any
manner whatsoever by the General Assembly. No other body shall be established
by law to perform functions that are the same or similar to those granted to the
commission in Sections 1 to 12 of this Act.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 5 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) A person shall not influence or attempt to influence a commissioner by coercion,
bribe, favor, promise, inducement, or otherwise, related to any duty undertaken
by a commissioner in his or her capacity as a commissioner.
(2) Commission members, staff, attorneys, experts, and consultants shall not directly
or indirectly solicit or accept any gift or loan of money, goods, services, or other
thing of value greater than twenty dollars ($20) for the benefit of any person or
organization, which may influence the manner in which the commission member,
staff, attorney, expert, or consultant performs his or her duties.
(3) Any person found guilty of violating this section shall be guilty of a violation and
shall be subject to a fine of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).
(4) Comments or suggestions at public hearings or public meetings shall not be
Page 19 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 134
considered a violation under this section.
SECTION 12. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 5 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
If any provision of Sections 1 to 12 of this Act or the application thereof to any person
or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of Sections 1 to 12 of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to this end the provisions of Sections 1 to 12 of this Act
are severable.
Section 13. KRS 5.005 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An action challenging the constitutionality of any legislative district created by this
chapter shall be brought in the Circuit Court of the county where the plaintiff
resides.
(2) The Advisory Redistricting Commission[Secretary of State] shall be named as a
defendant in any action challenging the constitutionality of any legislative district
created by this chapter.
(3) The Legislative Research Commission may intervene as a matter of right in any
action challenging the constitutionality of any legislative district created by this
chapter.
Section 14. This Act may be cited as the Fair Maps Act.
Page 20 of 20
BR013400.100 - 134 - XXXX 1/16/2026 2:53 PM Jacketed